District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.02

Terms of members; filling of vacancies.

(a)

The terms of members of a board or advisory committee, after the initial terms, shall expire on the 3rd anniversary of the date the 1st members constituting a quorum take the oath of office.

(b)

At the end of a term, a member shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed and sworn into office.

(c)

A vacancy on a board or advisory committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

(d)

A member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only until the expiration of the term or until a successor is appointed and sworn into office.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 402, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3304.2.
This section is referenced in § 3-1202.03.